Missouri, session 2026, HB2408.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the state of Missouri, as follows:
Section A. Section 161.412, RSMo, is repealed and one new section enacted in lieu
thereof, to be known as section 161.412, to read as follows:
161.412. 1. Subject to appropriations, the Missouri commission for the deaf and hard
of hearing shall provide grants to:
(1) Organizations that provide services for deaf-blind children and their families.
Such services may include providing family support advocates to assist deaf-blind children in
participating in their communities and family education specialists to teach parents and
siblings skills to support the deaf-blind children in their family;
(2) Organizations that provide services for deaf-blind adults. Such grants shall be
used to provide assistance to deaf-blind adults who are working towards establishing and
maintaining independence; and
(3) Organizations that train support service providers. Such grants shall be used to
provide training that will lead to certification of support service providers in Missouri.
2. The commission shall use a request-for-proposal process to award the grants in this
section. Organizations that receive grants under this section may expend the grant for any
EXPLANATION — Matter enclosed in bold-faced brackets [thus] in the above bill is not enacted and is
intended to be omitted from the law. Matter in bold-face type in the above bill is proposed language.

HB 2408 2
purpose authorized in this section. [The total amount of grants provided under this section
shall not exceed three hundred thousand dollars annually.]
✔